South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 17-13-150 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-13-150. When anya person is served with a search warrant, suchthe person shallmust be furnished with a copy of the warrant along with the affidavit upon which such warrant was issuedand, if a copy of the inventory is demanded by the person from whose person or premises the property is taken, a copy of the inventory must be delivered to him. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----